Utah statutes.
76-6a-5.   Plan provisions not constituting defenses.

It is not a defense to an action brought under this chapter if:

(1)  The sales device or plan limits the number of persons who may be introduced into it;

(2)  The sales device or plan includes additional conditions affecting eligibility for introduction into it or when compensation is received from it; or

(3)  A person receives property or services in addition to the compensation or right to receive compensation in connection with a pyramid scheme.

